Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201269-404
Secondary metals recycler; limitations
on payment.

No secondary metals recycler shall purchase regulated
metals property for cash consideration unless the purchase total is not more
than twenty-five dollars. Purchases made from the same person within a four-hour
period shall be considered a single transaction. Payment shall be made payable
only to the individual named on the identification presented pursuant to section
69-402. Payment for copper and catalytic converters shall be by check, and if the purchase total for copper
is more than one hundred dollars, the check shall be sent by United States
mail, postage prepaid.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 3.